Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Chapter 47. Organic Certification Program

§ 69-47-1.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2011, ch. 482, § 13, effective July 1, 2013.

§69-47-1. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 480, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 482, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 4, 2011.)]

§ 69-47-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2011, ch. 482, § 11, effective from and after passage (Approved April 4, 2011).

§69-47-3. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 480, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2003.]

§§ 69-47-5 through 69-47-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2011, ch. 482, § 13, effective July 1, 2013.

§69-47-5. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 480, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 482, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 4, 2011.)]

§69-47-7. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 4; Laws, 2011, ch. 482, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 4, 2011.)]

§69-47-9. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 5; Laws, 2011, ch. 482, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 4, 2011.)]

§ 69-47-11.
Recertification after removal from organic management.

If a certified farm, field or greenhouse unit is removed from organic management, it may be recertified after passage of three (3) years without the application of a prohibited pesticide and two (2) years without the application of a prohibited fertilizer or other prohibited material.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 69-47-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2011, ch. 482, § 13, effective July 1, 2013.

§69-47-13. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 7; Laws, 2011, ch. 482, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 4, 2011.)]

§ 69-47-15.
Audits.

The department may conduct or provide for audits of all documents used to verify that certified products meet organic standards.

These audits shall include, where appropriate:

An inventory audit, a listing of the formulations of the product, percent accuracy in labeling, the amount bought and sold per product and producer or destination and the number of vendors and amount of product per vendor; or

A farm audit, listing the amounts sold per product, date and destination and the area and location planted of each product with dates of harvest.

Information contained in audit records that is exempt under the Public Records Act of Mississippi shall remain confidential. Such exempt confidential information shall include, but not be limited to:

Information that, if released, would give advantage to competitors or bidders; and

Trade secrets and commercial or financial information obtained from a person and privileged or confidential by statute or judicial decision.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§§ 69-47-17 through 69-47-23.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2011, ch. 482, § 13, effective July 1, 2013.

§69-41-17. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 9; Laws, 2004, ch. 497, § 2; Laws, 2011, ch. 482, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 4, 2011.)]

§69-41-19. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 10; Laws, 2011, ch. 482, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 4, 2011.)]

§69-41-21. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 11; Laws, 2011, ch. 482, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 4, 2011.)]

§69-41-23. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 12; Laws, 2011, ch. 482, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 4, 2011.)]

§ 69-47-25.
Inspection and renewal fees.

The department shall establish a fee schedule for application, inspection and annual certification fees. The fee schedule shall be provided to all persons inquiring about the application process.

Producers and processors participating in the department’s organic certification program will be charged an inspection fee and an annual certification fee. Retailers and distributors shall be charged an application fee for the initial inspection conducted by the department in accordance with this chapter and the regulations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 13; Laws, 2004, ch. 497, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 2004.).

§ 69-47-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2011, ch. 482, § 13, effective July 1, 2013.

§69-47-27. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 14; Laws, 2011, ch. 482, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 4, 2011.)]

§§ 69-47-29 and 69-47-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2003, ch. 480 § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§69-47-29. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2000.]

§69-47-31. [Laws, 2000, ch. 600, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2000.]

§ 69-47-33.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2011, ch. 482, § 12, effective from and after passage (Approved April 4, 2011).

§69-47-33. [Laws, 2003, ch. 480, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2003.]